California statutes. Penal Code
(b) In addition to any other costs that a court is authorized to require a defendant to pay, upon conviction of any offense involving sexual assault or attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, the court may require that the defendant pay, to the law enforcement agency, county, or local governmental agency incurring the cost, the cost of any medical examinations conducted on the victim for the collection and preservation of evidence. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay all or part of the cost of the medical examination, the court may set the amount to be reimbursed and order
 the defendant to pay that sum to the law enforcement agency, county, or local governmental agency, in the manner in which the court believes reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability. In making the determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution. In no event shall a court penalize an indigent defendant by imposing an additional period of imprisonment in lieu of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1i.

(a) In any case in which a defendant is convicted of a violation of any building standards adopted by a local entity by ordinance or resolution, including, but not limited to, local health, fire, building, or safety ordinances or resolutions, or any other ordinance or resolution relating to the health and safety of occupants of buildings, by maintaining a substandard building, as specified in Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code, the court, or judge thereof, in making an order granting probation, in addition to any other orders, may order the defendant placed under house confinement, or may order the defendant to serve both a term of imprisonment in the county jail and to be placed under house confinement.

This section only applies to violations involving a dwelling unit occupied by persons specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1940 of the Civil Code who are not excluded by subdivision (b) of that section.

(b) If the court orders a defendant to serve all or part of his or her sentence under house confinement, pursuant to subdivision (a), he or she may also be ordered to pay the cost of having a police officer or guard stand guard outside the area in which the defendant has been confined under house confinement if it has been determined that the defendant is able to pay these costs.

(c) As used in this section, “house confinement” means confinement to a residence or location designated by the court and specified in the probation order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1063, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1j.

In any case in which the defendant is convicted of assault, battery, or assault with a deadly weapon on a victim 65 years of age or older, and the defendant knew or reasonably should have known the elderly status of the victim, the court, as a condition of probation, shall order the defendant to make restitution for the costs of medical or psychological treatment incurred by the victim as a result of the crime, and that the defendant seek and maintain legitimate employment and apply that portion of his or her earnings specified by the court toward those costs.

The defendant shall be entitled to a hearing, concerning any modification of the amount of restitution, based on the costs of medical and psychological treatment incurred by the victim subsequent to the issuance of the order of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 45, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1k.

For any order of restitution made under Section 1203.1, the court may order the specific amount of restitution and the manner in which restitution shall be made to a victim or the Restitution Fund, to the extent that the victim has received payment from the Victims of Crime Program, based on the probation officer’s report or it may, with the consent of the defendant, order the probation officer to set the amount of restitution and the manner in which restitution shall be made to a victim or the Restitution Fund, to the extent that the victim has received payment from the Victims of Crime Program. The defendant shall have the right to a hearing before the judge to dispute the determinations made by the probation officer in regard to the amount or manner in which restitution is to be made to the victim or the Restitution Fund, to the extent that the victim has received payment from the Victims of Crime Program. If the court orders restitution to be made to the Restitution Fund, the court, and not the probation officer, shall determine the amount and the manner in which restitution is to be made to the Restitution Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1016, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1l.

In any case in which, pursuant to Section 1203.1, the court orders the defendant, as a condition of probation, to make restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response, all of the following shall apply: 

(a) The probation department shall obtain the actual costs for an emergency response from a public agency, and shall include the public agency’s documents supporting the actual costs for the emergency response in the probation department’s sentencing report to the court.

(b) At the sentencing hearing, the defendant has the right to confront witnesses and present evidence in opposition to the amount claimed to be due to the public agency for its actual costs for the emergency response.

(c) The collection of the emergency response costs is the responsibility of the public agency seeking the reimbursement. If a defendant fails to make restitution payment when a payment is due, the public agency shall by verified declaration notify the probation department of the delinquency. The probation department shall make an investigation of the delinquency and shall make a report to the court of the delinquency. The report shall contain any recommendation that the probation officer finds to be relevant regarding the delinquency and future payments. The court, after a hearing on the delinquency, may make modifications to the existing order in the furtherance of justice.

(d) The defendant has the right to petition the court for a modification of the emergency response reimbursement order whenever he or she has sustained a substantial change in economic circumstances. The defendant has a right to a hearing on the proposed modification, and the court may make any modification to the existing order in the furtherance of justice.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1203.1i (as added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 713) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.2.

(a) At any time during the period of supervision of a person (1) released on probation under the care of a probation officer pursuant to this chapter, (2) released on conditional sentence or summary probation not under the care of a probation officer, (3) placed on mandatory supervision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, (4) subject to revocation of postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3455, or (5) subject to revocation of parole supervision pursuant to Section 3000.08, if any probation officer, parole officer, or peace officer has probable cause to believe that the supervised person is violating any term or condition of the person’s supervision, the officer may, without warrant or
 other process and at any time until the final disposition of the case, rearrest the supervised person and bring them before the court or the court may, in its discretion, issue a warrant for their rearrest. Unless the person on probation is otherwise serving a period of flash incarceration, whenever a person on probation who is subject to this section is arrested, with or without a warrant or the filing of a petition for revocation as described in subdivision (b), the court shall consider the release of a person on probation from custody in accordance with Section 1203.25. Notwithstanding Section 3056, and unless the supervised person is otherwise serving a period of flash incarceration, whenever any supervised person who is subject to this section and who is not on probation is arrested, with or without a warrant or the filing of a petition for revocation as described in subdivision (b), the court may
 order the release of the supervised person from custody under any terms and conditions the court deems appropriate. Upon rearrest, or upon the issuance of a warrant for rearrest, the court may revoke and terminate the supervision of the person if the interests of justice so require and the court, in its judgment, has reason to believe from the report of the probation or parole officer or otherwise that the person has violated any of the conditions of their supervision, or has subsequently committed other offenses, regardless of whether the person has been prosecuted for those offenses. However, the court shall not terminate parole pursuant to this section. Supervision shall not be revoked solely for failure of a person to make restitution, or to pay fines, fees, or assessments, imposed as a condition of supervision unless the court determines that the defendant has willfully failed to pay and has
 the ability to pay. Restitution shall be consistent with a person’s ability to pay. The revocation, summary or otherwise, shall serve to toll the running of the period of supervision.

(b) (1) Upon its own motion or upon the petition of the supervised person, the probation or parole officer, or the district attorney, the court may modify, revoke, or terminate supervision of the person pursuant to this subdivision, except that the court shall not terminate parole pursuant to this section. The court in the county in which the person is supervised has jurisdiction to hear the motion or petition, or for those on parole, either the court in the county of supervision or the court in the county in which the alleged violation of supervision occurred. A person supervised on parole or postrelease community supervision pursuant to
 Section 3455 may not petition the court pursuant to this section for early release from supervision, and a petition under this section shall not be filed solely for the purpose of modifying parole. This section does not prohibit the court in the county in which the person is supervised or in which the alleged violation of supervision occurred from modifying a person’s parole when acting on the court’s own motion or a petition to revoke parole. The court shall give notice of its motion, and the probation or parole officer or the district attorney shall give notice of their petition to the supervised person, the supervised person’s attorney of record, and the district attorney or the probation or parole officer, as the case may be. The supervised person shall give notice of their petition to the probation or parole officer and notice of any motion or petition shall be given to the district attorney in
 all cases. The court shall refer its motion or the petition to the probation or parole officer. After the receipt of a written report from the probation or parole officer, the court shall read and consider the report and either its motion or the petition and may modify, revoke, or terminate the supervision of the supervised person upon the grounds set forth in subdivision (a) if the interests of justice so require.

(2) The notice required by this subdivision may be given to the supervised person upon their first court appearance in the proceeding. Upon the agreement by the supervised person in writing to the specific terms of a modification or termination of a specific term of supervision, any requirement that the supervised person make a personal appearance in court for the purpose of a modification or termination shall be waived. Prior to
 the modification or termination and waiver of appearance, the supervised person shall be informed of their right to consult with counsel, and if indigent the right to secure court-appointed counsel. If the supervised person waives their right to counsel a written waiver shall be required. If the supervised person consults with counsel and thereafter agrees to a modification, revocation, or termination of the term of supervision and waiver of personal appearance, the agreement shall be signed by counsel showing approval for the modification or termination and waiver.

(c) Upon any revocation and termination of probation the court may, if the sentence has been suspended, pronounce judgment for any time within the longest period for which the person might have been sentenced. However, if the judgment has been pronounced and the execution
 thereof has been suspended, the court may revoke the suspension and order that the judgment shall be in full force and effect. In either case, the person shall be delivered over to the proper officer to serve their sentence, less any credits herein provided for.

(d) In any case of revocation and termination of probation, including, but not limited to, cases in which the judgment has been pronounced and the execution thereof has been suspended, upon the revocation and termination, the court may, in lieu of any other sentence, commit the person to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities if the person is otherwise eligible for that commitment.

(e) If probation has been revoked before the judgment has been pronounced, the order revoking
 probation may be set aside for good cause upon motion made before pronouncement of judgment. If probation has been revoked after the judgment has been pronounced, the judgment and the order which revoked the probation may be set aside for good cause within 30 days after the court has notice that the execution of the sentence has commenced. If an order setting aside the judgment, the revocation of probation, or both is made after the expiration of the probationary period, the court may again place the person on probation for that period and with those terms and conditions as it could have done immediately following conviction.

(f) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Court” means a judge, magistrate, or revocation hearing officer described in
 Section 71622.5 of the Government Code.

(2) “Probation officer” means a probation officer as described in Section 1203 or an officer of the agency designated by the board of supervisors of a county to implement postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3451.

(3) “Supervised person” means a person who satisfies any of the following:

(A) The person is released on probation subject to the supervision of a probation officer.

(B) The person is released on conditional sentence or summary probation not under the care of a probation officer.

(C) The person is subject to mandatory supervision
 pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(D) The person is subject to revocation of postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3455.

(E) The person is subject to revocation of parole pursuant to Section 3000.08.

(g) This section does not affect the authority of the supervising agency to impose intermediate sanctions, including flash incarceration, to persons supervised on parole pursuant to Section 3000.8 or postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.2a.

If any defendant who has been released on probation is committed to a prison in this state or another state for another offense, the court which released him or her on probation shall have jurisdiction to impose sentence, if no sentence has previously been imposed for the offense for which he or she was granted probation, in the absence of the defendant, on the request of the defendant made through his or her counsel, or by himself or herself in writing, if such writing is signed in the presence of the warden of the prison in which he or she is confined or the duly authorized representative of the warden, and the warden or his or her representative attests both that the defendant has made and signed such request and that he or she states that he or she wishes the court to impose sentence in the case in which he or she was released on probation, in his or her absence and without him or her being represented by counsel.

The probation officer may, upon learning of the defendant’s imprisonment, and must within 30 days after being notified in writing by the defendant or his or her counsel, or the warden or duly authorized representative of the prison in which the defendant is confined, report such commitment to the court which released him or her on probation.

Upon being informed by the probation officer of the defendant’s confinement, or upon receipt from the warden or duly authorized representative of any prison in this state or another state of a certificate showing that the defendant is confined in prison, the court shall issue its commitment if sentence has previously been imposed. If sentence has not been previously imposed and if the defendant has requested the court through counsel or in writing in the manner herein provided to impose sentence in the case in which he or she was released on probation in his or her absence and without the presence of counsel to represent him or her, the court shall impose sentence and issue its commitment, or shall make other final order terminating its jurisdiction over the defendant in the case in which the order of probation was made. If the case is one in which sentence has previously been imposed, the court shall be deprived of jurisdiction over defendant if it does not issue its commitment or make other final order terminating its jurisdiction over defendant in the case within 60 days after being notified of the confinement. If the case is one in which sentence has not previously been imposed, the court is deprived of jurisdiction over defendant if it does not impose sentence and issue its commitment or make other final order terminating its jurisdiction over defendant in the case within 30 days after defendant has, in the manner prescribed by this section, requested imposition of sentence.

Upon imposition of sentence hereunder the commitment shall be dated as of the date upon which probation was granted. If the defendant is then in a state prison for an offense committed subsequent to the one upon which he or she has been on probation, the term of imprisonment of such defendant under a commitment issued hereunder shall commence upon the date upon which defendant was delivered to prison under commitment for his or her subsequent offense. Any terms ordered to be served consecutively shall be served as otherwise provided by law.

In the event the probation officer fails to report such commitment to the court or the court fails to impose sentence as herein provided, the court shall be deprived thereafter of all jurisdiction it may have retained in the granting of probation in said case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.25.

(a) All persons released by a court at or after the initial hearing and prior to a formal probation violation hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1203.2 shall be released on their own recognizance unless the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the particular circumstances of the case require the imposition of an order to provide reasonable protection to the public and reasonable assurance of the person’s future appearance in court.

(1) The court shall make an individualized determination of the factors that do or do not indicate that the person would be a danger to the public if released pending a formal revocation hearing. Any finding of danger to the public
 must be based on clear and convincing evidence.

(2) The court shall not require the use of any algorithm-based risk assessment tool in setting conditions of release.

(3) The court shall impose the least restrictive conditions of release necessary to provide reasonable protection of the public and reasonable assurance of the person’s future appearance in court.

(b) Reasonable conditions of release may include, but are not limited to, reporting telephonically to a probation officer, protective orders, a global positioning system (GPS) monitoring device or other electronic monitoring, an alcohol use detection device, or search and seizure by a probation officer or other peace officer. The person shall not be required
 to bear the expense of any conditions of release ordered by the court.

(c) (1) Bail shall not be imposed unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that other reasonable conditions of release are not adequate to provide reasonable protection of the public and reasonable assurance of the person’s future appearance in court.

(2) “Bail” as used in this section is defined as cash bail. A bail bond or property bond is not bail. In determining the amount of bail, the court shall make an individualized determination based on the particular circumstances of the case, and it shall consider the person’s ability to pay cash bail, not a bail bond or property bond. Bail shall be set at a level the person can reasonably afford.

(d) The court shall not deny release for a person on probation for misdemeanor conduct before the court holds a formal probation revocation hearing, unless the person fails to comply with an order of the court, including an order to appear in court in the underlying case, in which case subdivision (a) shall apply.

(e) The court shall not deny release for a person on probation for felony conduct before the court holds a formal probation revocation hearing unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that there are no means reasonably available to provide reasonable protection of the public and reasonable assurance of the person’s future appearance in court.

(f) All findings required to be made by clear and convincing evidence under this section shall, based on all
 evidence presented,
 including, but not limited to, any probation report, be made orally on the record by the court. The court also shall set forth the reason in an order entered upon the minutes if requested by either party in any case in which the proceedings are not being reported by a court reporter.

(g) If a new charge is the basis for a probation violation, nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court’s authority to hold, release, limit release, or impose conditions of release for that charge as permitted by applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 218, Sec. 8.   (SB 852)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.3.

(a) The court has the authority at any time during the term of probation to revoke, modify, or change its order of suspension of imposition or execution of sentence. The court may at any time when the ends of justice will be subserved thereby, and when the good conduct and reform of the person so held on probation shall warrant it, terminate the period of probation, and discharge the person held. The court also has the authority at any time during the term of mandatory supervision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 to revoke, modify, or change the conditions of the court’s order suspending the execution of the concluding portion of the supervised person’s term.

(b) The exercise of the court’s authority in subdivision (a) to revoke, modify, or change probation or mandatory supervision, or to terminate probation, is subject to the following:

(1) Before any sentence or term or condition of probation or condition of mandatory supervision is modified, a hearing shall be held in open court before the judge. The prosecuting attorney shall be given a two-day written notice and an opportunity to be heard on the matter, except that, as to modifying or terminating a protective order in a case involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, the prosecuting attorney shall be given a five-day written notice and an opportunity to be heard.

(A) If the sentence or term or
 condition of probation or the term or any condition of mandatory supervision is modified pursuant to this section, the judge shall state the reasons for that modification on the record.

(B) As used in this section, modification of sentence shall include reducing a felony to a misdemeanor.

(2) (A) An order shall not be made without written notice first given by the court or the clerk thereof to the
 proper probation officer of the intention to revoke, modify, or change its order.

(B) Before an order terminating probation early may be made, a hearing shall be held in open court before the judge. The prosecuting attorney shall be given a two-day written notice and an opportunity to be heard on the matter.
 The prosecuting attorney shall provide notice to the victim if the victim has requested to be notified about the progress of the case. If the victim advises the prosecuting attorney that there is an outstanding restitution order or restitution fine, as specified in Section 1202.4, the prosecuting attorney shall request a continuance of the hearing.

(3) In all probation cases, if the court has not seen fit to revoke the order of probation and impose sentence or pronounce judgment, the defendant shall at the end of the term of probation or any extension thereof, be discharged by the court subject to the provisions of these sections.

(4) The court may modify the time and manner of the term of probation for purposes of measuring the timely payment of restitution obligations or
 the good conduct and reform of the defendant while on probation. The court shall not modify the dollar amount of the restitution obligations due to the good conduct and reform of the defendant, absent compelling and extraordinary reasons, nor shall the court limit the ability of payees to enforce the obligations in the manner of judgments in civil actions.

(5) This section does not prohibit the court from modifying the dollar amount of a restitution order pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 at any time during the term of the probation.

(6) The court may limit or terminate a protective order that is a condition of probation or mandatory supervision in a case involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code. In determining whether to limit or
 terminate the protective order, the court shall consider if there has been any material change in circumstances since the crime for which the order was issued, and any issue that relates to whether there exists good cause for the change, including, but not limited to, consideration of all of the following:

(A) Whether the probationer or supervised person has accepted responsibility for the abusive behavior perpetrated against the victim.

(B) Whether the probationer or supervised person is currently attending and actively participating in counseling sessions.

(C) Whether the probationer or supervised person has completed parenting counseling, or attended alcoholics or narcotics counseling.

(D) Whether the probationer or supervised person has moved from the state, or is incarcerated.

(E) Whether the probationer or supervised person is still cohabiting, or intends to cohabit, with any subject of the order.

(F) Whether the defendant has performed well on probation or mandatory supervision, including consideration of any progress reports.

(G) Whether the victim desires the change, and if so, the victim’s reasons, whether the victim has consulted a victim advocate, and whether the victim has prepared a safety plan and has access to local resources.

(H) Whether the change will impact any
 children involved, including consideration of any child protective services information.

(I) Whether the ends of justice would be served by limiting or terminating the order.

(c) If a probationer is ordered to serve time in jail, and the probationer escapes while serving that time, the probation is revoked as a matter of law on the day of the escape.

(d) If probation is revoked pursuant to subdivision (c), upon taking the probationer into custody, the probationer shall be accorded a hearing or hearings consistent with the holding in the case of People v. Vickers (1972) 8 Cal.3d 451. The purpose of that hearing or hearings is not to revoke probation, as the revocation has occurred as a matter of law in accordance with
 subdivision (c), but rather to afford the defendant an opportunity to require the prosecution to establish that the alleged violation did in fact occur and to justify the revocation.

(e) This section does not apply to cases covered by Section 1203.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 433)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.35.

(a) (1) In any case in which the court grants probation or imposes a sentence that includes mandatory supervision, the county probation department is authorized to use flash incarceration for any violation of the conditions of probation or mandatory supervision if, at the time of granting probation or ordering mandatory supervision, the court obtains from the defendant a waiver to a court hearing prior to the imposition of a period of flash incarceration. Probation shall not be denied for refusal to sign the waiver.

(2) Each county probation department shall develop a response matrix that establishes protocols for the imposition of graduated sanctions for
 violations of the conditions of probation to determine appropriate interventions to include the use of flash incarceration.

(3) A supervisor shall approve the term of flash incarceration prior to the imposition of flash incarceration.

(4) Upon a decision to impose a period of flash incarceration, the probation department shall notify the court, public defender, district attorney, and sheriff of each imposition of flash incarceration.

(5) If the person on probation or mandatory supervision does not agree to accept a recommended period of flash incarceration, upon a determination that there has been a violation, the probation officer is authorized to address the alleged violation by filing a declaration or revocation
 request with the court.

(b) For purposes of this section, “flash incarceration” is a period of detention in a county jail due to a violation of an offender’s conditions of probation or mandatory supervision. The length of the detention period may range between 1 and 10 consecutive days. Shorter, but if necessary more frequent, periods of detention for violations of an offender’s conditions of probation or mandatory supervision shall appropriately punish an offender while preventing the disruption in a work or home establishment that typically arises from longer periods of detention. In cases in which there are multiple violations in a single incident, only one flash incarceration booking is authorized and may range between 1 and 10 consecutive days.

(c) This section shall not apply to
 any defendant sentenced pursuant to Section 1210.1.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   (AB 1744)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.4.

(a) (1) When a defendant has fulfilled the conditions of probation for the entire period of probation, or has been discharged prior to the termination of the period of probation, or in any other case in which a court, in its discretion and the interest of justice, determines that a defendant should be granted the relief available under this section, the defendant shall, at any time after the termination of the period of probation, if they are not then serving a sentence for an offense, on probation for an offense, or charged with the commission of an offense, be permitted by the court to withdraw their plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty; or, if they have been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court shall set aside the verdict of guilty; and, in either case,
 the court shall thereupon dismiss the accusations or information against the defendant and except as noted below, the defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which they have been convicted, except as provided in Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code. The probationer shall be informed, in their probation papers, of this right and privilege and the right, if any, to petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon. The probationer may make the application and change of plea in person or by attorney, or by the probation officer authorized in writing. However, in any subsequent prosecution of the defendant for any other offense, the prior conviction may be pleaded and proved and shall have the same effect as if probation had not been granted or the accusation or information dismissed. The order shall state, and the probationer shall be informed, that the order does not relieve them of the obligation to disclose the conviction in response to any
 direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for public office, for licensure by any state or local agency, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(2) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not permit a person to own, possess, or have custody or control of a firearm or to prevent conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(3) Dismissal of an accusation or information underlying a conviction pursuant to this section does not permit a person prohibited from holding public office as a result of that conviction to hold public office.

(4) Dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to this section does not release the defendant from the terms and conditions of an unexpired criminal
 protective order that has been issued by the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 136.2, subdivision (j) of Section 273.5, subdivision (l) of Section 368, or subdivision (k) of Section 646.9. These protective orders shall remain in full effect until expiration or until any further order by the court modifying or terminating the order, despite the dismissal of the underlying accusation or information.

(5) This subdivision shall apply to all applications for relief under this section which are filed on or after November 23, 1970.

(b) Subdivision (a) of this section does not apply to a misdemeanor that is within the provisions of Section 42002.1 of the Vehicle Code, to a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 286, Section 288, subdivision (c) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a, Section 288.5, subdivision (j) of Section 289, Section 311.1, 311.2, 311.3,
 or 311.11, or a felony conviction pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 261.5, or to an infraction.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), subdivision (a) does not apply to a person who receives a notice to appear or is otherwise charged with a violation of an offense described in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 12810 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) If a defendant who was convicted of a violation listed in paragraph (1) petitions the court, the court in its discretion and in the interest of justice, may order the relief provided pursuant to subdivision (a) to that defendant.

(3) (A) A petition for relief under this section shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.

(B) An unfulfilled order of restitution or a restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not fulfil the condition of probation for the entire period of probation.

(C) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief.

(d) (1) Relief shall not be granted under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the petition for relief. The probation officer shall notify the prosecuting attorney when a petition is filed, pursuant to this section.

(2) It shall be presumed that the prosecuting attorney has received notice if proof of service is filed with the court.

(e) If, after receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (d), the prosecuting attorney fails to appear and object to a petition for dismissal, the prosecuting attorney may not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that petition.

(f) Notwithstanding the above provisions or any other law, the Governor shall have the right to pardon a person convicted of a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 286, Section 288, subdivision (c) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a, Section 288.5, or subdivision (j) of Section 289, if there are extraordinary circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 6.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.4a.

(a) Every defendant convicted of a misdemeanor and not granted probation, and every defendant convicted of an infraction shall, at any time after the lapse of one year from the date of pronouncement of judgment, if they have fully complied with and performed the sentence of the court, are not then serving a sentence for an offense and are not under charge of commission of a crime, and have, since the pronouncement of judgment, lived an honest and upright life and have conformed to and obeyed the laws of the land, be permitted by the court to withdraw their plea of guilty or nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty; or if they have been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court shall set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either
 case the court shall dismiss the accusatory pleading against the defendant, who shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which they have been convicted, except as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 of this code or Section 13555 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) If a defendant does not satisfy all the requirements of subdivision (a), after a lapse of one year from the date of pronouncement of judgment, a court, in its discretion and in the interest of justice, may grant the relief available pursuant to subdivision (a) to a defendant convicted of an infraction, or of a misdemeanor and not granted probation, or both, if the defendant has fully complied with and performed the sentence of the court, is not then serving a sentence for any offense, and is not
 under charge of commission of a crime.

(c) (1) The defendant shall be informed of the provisions of this section, either orally or in writing, at the time they are sentenced. The defendant may make an application and change of